Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.130

District judges pro tempore—Reduction in salary of replaced judges—Exception—Reimbursement of counties.

(1) In addition to the designation of a presiding judge pro tempore for a single judge court as provided in RCW 3.34.150(2), each district court shall designate one or more persons as judge pro tempore who shall serve during the temporary absence, disqualification, or incapacity of a district judge or to serve as an additional judge for excess caseload or special set cases. The qualifications of a judge pro tempore shall be the same as for a district judge, except that with respect to RCW 3.34.060(1), the person appointed need only be a registered voter of the state. A district that has a population of not more than ten thousand and that has no person available who meets the qualifications under *RCW 3.34.060(2) (a) or (b), may appoint as a pro tempore judge a person who has taken and passed the qualifying examination for the office of district judge as is provided by rule of the supreme court. A judge pro tempore may sit in any district of the county for which he or she is appointed. A judge pro tempore shall be paid the salary authorized by the county legislative authority.

(2) For each day that a judge pro tempore serves in excess of thirty days during any calendar year, the annual salary of the district judge in whose place the judge pro tempore serves shall be reduced by an amount equal to one-two hundred fiftieth of such salary: PROVIDED, That each full time district judge shall have up to fifteen days annual leave without reduction for service on judicial commissions established by the legislature or the chief justice of the supreme court. No reduction in salary shall occur when a judge pro tempore serves:

(a) While a district judge is using sick leave granted in accordance with RCW 3.34.100;

(b) While a district court judge is disqualified from serving following the filing of an affidavit of prejudice;

(c) As an additional judge for excess case load or special set cases; or

(d) While a district judge is otherwise involved in administrative, educational, or judicial functions related to the performance of the judge's duties: PROVIDED, That the appointment of judge pro tempore authorized under subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section is subject to an appropriation for this purpose by the county legislative authority.

(3) The legislature may appropriate money for the purpose of reimbursing counties for the salaries of judges pro tempore for certain days in excess of thirty worked per year that the judge pro tempore was required to work as the result of service by a judge on a commission as authorized under subsection (2) of this section. No later than September 1 of each year, each county treasurer shall certify to the administrator for the courts for the year ending the preceding June 30, the number of days in excess of thirty that any judge pro tempore was required to work as the result of service by a judge on a commission as authorized under subsection (2) of this section. Upon receipt of the certification, the administrator for the courts shall reimburse the county from money appropriated for that purpose.

[ 2022 c 74 s 7; 1996 c 16 s 1; 1994 c 18 s 1; 1993 c 330 s 1; 1986 c 161 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 302; 1984 c 258 s 19; 1983 c 195 s 2; 1981 c 331 s 9; 1961 c 299 s 22.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 3.34.060 was amended by 2002 c 136 s 1, deleting subsection (2)(b).

Severability—1986 c 161: See note following RCW 43.03.010.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Legislative intent—1984 c 258 ss 302-340: "It is the intent of the legislature to assure accountability, uniformity, economy, and efficiency in the collection and distribution by superior, district, and municipal courts of fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties assessed and collected for violations of state, statutes, and county, city, and town ordinances." [ 1984 c 258 s 301.]

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.